Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202286-1405
Grant; conditions.

If the grant application is to provide adequate precision agriculture connectivity as described in subdivision (2)(a) of section 86-1404, the applicant shall agree to:

(1) Complete the project within twelve months after the date on which the grant is awarded. The commission may permit one extension of up to six months upon request and for good cause shown; and

(2) Submit the connectivity to speed tests. If the speed tests show that the connectivity is not adequate precision agriculture connectivity, the applicant shall be allowed a reasonable time to correct the deficiencies. If the applicant fails to provide adequate precision agriculture connectivity after the second set of speed tests, the applicant shall repay the grant.

Laws 2022, LB1144, § 16.
July 21, 2022